Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1510.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "community transportation service" or "shared ride service," "community transportation system," "local transportation organization," "operating expenses" and "Public Passenger Transportation Performance Report" in section 1503 of Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 1503. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter 123456789101112131415161718192021 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Class 1 transit entity." A local transportation organization or transportation company, excluding PAAC, operating 1,000 or more transit vehicles in the peak period."Class 2 transit entity." A local transportation organization or transportation company, excluding SEPTA, operating more than 300 but less than 1,000 transit vehicles in the peak period."Class 3 transit entity." A local transportation organization or transportation company, excluding SEPTA and PAAC, operating 300 or less fixed-route transit vehicles in the peak period serving an urbanized area. A class 3 transit entity may also hold a class 4 designation for certain portions of its service area for purposes of eligible funding."Class 4 transit entity." A local transportation organization or transportation company, excluding SEPTA and PAAC, which serves a nonurbanized area and, during the 1990-1991 fiscal year, received or was approved to receive funding under the act of February 11, 1976 (P.L.14, No.10), known as the Pennsylvania Rural and Intercity Common Carrier Surface Transportation Assistance Act. A class 4 transit entity may also hold a class 3 designation for certain portions of its service area for purposes of eligible funding.* * *"Community transportation service" or "shared ride service." [Door-to-door] A demand response transportation system that is available to the general public on a nonexclusive basis, operates on a nonfixed route basis and charges a fare to all 20250HB1510PN1779 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 riders. The term does not include exclusive ride taxi service, charter and sightseeing service, nonpublic transportation, school bus and limousine service."Community transportation system." A [person] public or nonprofit entity or organization that provides community transportation service designated by a county or other governmental entity and contracts with the Department of Transportation to receive revenue replacement funds.* * *"Formula Grants for Rural Areas Program." A public transportation program, authorized by the Congress of the United States and administered by the United States Department of Transportation to assist states and local governmental authorities in financing capital, operating, planning and job access and reverse commute projects, associated with providing public transportation in rural areas under 49 U.S.C. § 5311 (relating to formula grants for rural areas) . "Full level of performance." The objective standard established by the Federal Transit Administration or the department, or both, for determining whether a capital asset is in a state of good repair.* * *"Local transportation agency safety plan." The plan to improve the safety of all public transportation systems that receive Federal and State financial assistance under 49 U.S.C. § 5329 (relating to public transportation safety program)."Local transportation organization." Any of the following:(1) A political subdivision or a public transportation authority, port authority or redevelopment authority, organized under the laws of this Commonwealth or pursuant to 20250HB1510PN1779 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an interstate compact or otherwise empowered to render, contract for the rendering or assist in the rendering of transportation service in a limited area in this Commonwealth, even though it may also render or assist in rendering transportation service in adjacent states.(2) A legally existing and established nonprofit association that directly or indirectly provides public transportation service.(3) A legally existing and established nonprofit association of public transportation providers operating within this Commonwealth.* * *"Operating expenses." Total expenses required to continue service to the public and to permit needed improvements in service which are not self-supporting and otherwise for any purpose in furtherance of public passenger transportation[, including all State asset maintenance costs]. The term does not include expenditures for capital projects unless specific approval is provided by the Department of Transportation.* * *"PAAC." The Port Authority of Allegheny County organized and existing under the act of April 6, 1956 (1955 P.L.1414, No.465), known as the Second Class County Port Authority Act.* * *"Performance target." A quantifiable level of performance or condition, expressed as a value for the measure to be achieved for a fiscal year in order to reach a state of good repair."Preventive maintenance costs." The activities, supplies, materials, labor, services and associated costs required to preserve or extend the functionality and serviceability of an 20250HB1510PN1779 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 asset in a cost-effective manner, up to and including the current state of art for maintaining the asset.* * *"Public Passenger Transportation Performance Report." An annual report completed by the Department of Transportation which shall include all of the following:(1) Each local transportation organization's passengers, revenue vehicle miles, revenue vehicle hours and senior [passengers] ridership statistics for the most recently available fiscal year.(2) Any other statistical information that the Department of Transportation deems necessary.* * *"SEPTA." The Southeastern Pennsylvania Transportation Authority organization organized and existing under Chapter 17 (relating to metropolitan transportation authorities)."State of good repair." The condition in which a capital asset is able to operate at a full level of performance.* * *"Transit asset management plan." The federally required transit asset management plan that includes an inventory of capital assets, a condition assessment of inventoried assets, a decision support tool and a prioritization of investments needed to reach a state of good repair.* * *"Transportation development plan." A planning tool prepared by a transit entity used to analyze the need for transit in a defined area, evaluate the services that are provided and develop strategies to match the service to the identified transit needs.20250HB1510PN1779 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 2. Sections 1506(d)(2) and 1507(a)(6.1), (b) and (c) of Title 74 are amended to read:§ 1506. Fund.* * *(d) Use of revenues.--Money in the fund shall be used by the department as follows:* * *(2) for costs incurred directly by the department, not to exceed the amount allocated to the department under this chapter, in the administration of public passenger transportation programs, including under this chapter; and* * *§ 1507. Application and approval process.(a) Application.--An eligible applicant that wishes to receive financial assistance under this chapter shall submit a written application to the department on a form developed by the department, which shall include the following:* * *(6.1) [A statement of policy outlining the basic principles for the adjustment of fare growth to meet the rate of inflation.] A statement of policy outlining the basic policy for fare adjustments that may be needed to meet the financial and performance target of the transit organization as part of the transit organization's five-year financial projections included in the planning study or transportation development plan update to be completed under section 1513(e).* * *(b) Approval and award.--Upon determining that an applicant 20250HB1510PN1779 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 has complied with this chapter, applicable rules and regulations and any other requirement with respect to the financial assistance requested, the department may award financial assistance to the applicant. If the department awards financial assistance to the applicant, the department and the applicant shall enter into a financial assistance agreement setting forth the terms and conditions governing the use of the financial assistance and the timing of payment of the funds. The department, in collaboration with and duly considering and responding to all feedback and recommendations received from local transportation organizations , shall develop guidelines for the application for and awarding of financial assistance under this chapter and shall forward them to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(c) Restriction on use of funds.--[Unless the department grants the award recipient a waiver allowing the funds to be used for a different purpose, financial assistance under this chapter shall be used only for activities set forth under the financial assistance agreement. The department's regulations shall describe circumstances under which it will consider waiver requests and shall set forth all information to be included in a waiver request. The waiver request shall include a plan of corrective action to demonstrate that the award recipient does not have an ongoing need to use financial assistance funds for activities other than those for which funds were originally awarded. The duration of the waiver may not exceed the duration of the plan of corrective action. The department shall monitor implementation of the plan of corrective action. If the plan of corrective action is not implemented by the local transportation 20250HB1510PN1779 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 organization, the department shall rescind the waiver approval.] Financial assistance under this chapter shall be used only for activities provided under the financial assistance agreement unless the department grants the award recipient a waiver allowing the funds to be used for a different purpose. The department's regulations shall describe circumstances under which the department will consider waiver requests and shall provide all information to be included in a waiver request. The maximum duration of a waiver shall be until the financial need, project or activity is completed that warranted the waiver and may be further extended within the discretion of the department.Section 3. Section 1508 of Title 74 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1508. Federal funding.* * *(e) Subrecipients.--Rural public transportation funding received by the department from the Formula Grants for Rural Areas Program under 49 U.S.C. § 5311 (relating to formula grants for rural areas) shall be distributed to local transportation organizations that are subrecipients of Federal funds as provided under this subsection. The following shall apply:(1) The department shall allocate not less than 70% of the annual apportionment under 49 U.S.C. § 5311 that the department receives as the direct recipient of funds from the Formula Grants for Rural Areas Program to eligible class 3 and class 4 transit entities who have any form of rural service area. The distribution may not include funding received by the department under 49 U.S.C. § 5311(b)(3). The department shall prepare an annual application to the Federal Transit Administration for the full allocation of apportioned 20250HB1510PN1779 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 funds. The department's application shall outline the operation allocations for eligible subrecipients and capital allocations for eligible capital expenses.(2) Eligible applicants may apply for funds on an annual basis. The department shall maximize the use of funds under 49 U.S.C. § 5311 for operating and shall notify applicants by April 1 of each year of the amount for their allocation.(3) Eligible applicants may hold funds under section 1513 (relating to operating program) in reserve up to an amount that equals 100% of operating costs of the prior year. Allocations under section 1513 shall not be reduced if general State operating funds under section 1513 in reserve are less than 100% of systemwide budget operating costs of the prior year.(4) The Governor shall designate the department to allocate and distribute the funds with proper oversight for eligible activities under 49 U.S.C. § 5311 to ensure:(i) Priority for fixed route rural public transportation agencies.(ii) The provision of proper technical assistance for rural designated areas.(iii) Fair and equitable distribution of funds.(iv) State administration of projects required by objectives under 49 U.S.C. § 5311.(v) Subject to paragraph (5), development of rules to define the process for service expansion.(5) The following:(i) The department shall promulgate temporary regulations that shall expire no later than July 1, 2026, or upon promulgation of final regulations, whichever is 20250HB1510PN1779 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 earlier. The department may promulgate temporary regulations not subject to:(A) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(B) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(C) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(D) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(ii) The department's authority to adopt temporary regulations under subparagraph (i) shall expire 90 days after the effective date of this subparagraph. Regulations adopted after this period shall be promulgated as provided by law.(6) The department shall promulgate final-form regulations no later than July 1, 2027.(7) The department shall retain up to 5% of funds under section 1513 for discretionary use and distribution by the secretary.(8) The department shall, as part of its annual report, publish the amount of program funds under 49 U.S.C. § 5311 apportioned to the State, the amounts applied for and the amounts distributed to each subrecipient.Section 4. Section 1512(a) and (b)(1) of Title 74 are amended and subsection (b) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:20250HB1510PN1779 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 1512. Coordination and consolidation.(a) Coordination.--Coordination is required in regions where two or more award recipients have fixed route, shared ride, or both, services or activities for which financial assistance is being provided under this chapter to assure that the services or activities are provided efficiently and effectively.(b) Consolidation and mutual cooperation.--(1) The department, [in consultation with] at the request of local governments and local transportation organizations, shall study the feasibility of consolidation and mutual cooperation among local transportation organizations as a means of reducing annual expenses without loss of service to the communities they serve. The study shall examine the creation of service regions or mutual cooperation pacts to determine whether either method would reduce annual expenses. The feasibility analysis is to include a cost-benefit analysis and operational analysis.* * *(4) After the five-fiscal-year period under paragraph (3), the department shall waive the match requirement under sections 1513 and 1514 for an additional five fiscal years for the local transportation organization's participation in the recommended action under paragraph (2) in an amount not to exceed the estimated annual net savings of the implemented recommendations. At the end of the five-year period, the local match shall begin at the preconsolidated level.* * *Section 5. Sections 1513(a)(2), (d)(3) and (4), (e), (f), (g) and (h) and 1514(a), (b), (e) introductory paragraph and (2), (e.1) and (f) of Title 74 are amended to read:20250HB1510PN1779 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 1513. Operating program.(a) Eligible applicants.--The following may apply for financial assistance for operating expenses under this section:* * *(2) A Commonwealth agency or instrumentality whose primary purpose is providing public transportation.* * *(d) Local match requirements.--* * *(3) Eligible local matching funds shall consist only of cash contributions provided by one or more municipalities or counties. The amount of the match and the time period during which the match must continue to be available shall be specified in the financial assistance agreement. [Funding] At the discretion of the local transportation organization, funding provided by local and private entities, including [advertising or naming rights] non-fare transit revenue , may qualify as local matching funds to the extent they provide for the cost of transit service that is open to the public. The following shall not be considered local matching funds:(i) Any form of transit operating revenue or other forms of transit income provided by the local transportation organization.(ii) Funds used to replace fares.(4) A municipality in a metropolitan area which is a member of a local transportation organization which receives direct or indirect Federal funds is authorized to provide annual financial assistance from current revenues to the local transportation organization of which it is a member or enter into a long-term agreement for payment of money to 20250HB1510PN1779 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assist in defraying the costs of operation, maintenance and debt service of the local transportation organization or of a particular public transportation project of a local transportation organization. The obligation of a municipality under an agreement pursuant to this paragraph shall not be considered to be a part of the indebtedness of the municipality, nor shall the obligation be deemed to impair the status of any indebtedness of the municipality which would otherwise be considered self-sustaining.[(e) Performance reviews.--(1) The department may conduct performance reviews of an award recipient under this section to determine the effectiveness of the financial assistance. Reviews shall be conducted at regular intervals as established by the department in consultation with the management of the award recipient. After completion of a review, the department shall issue a report that:(i) highlights exceptional performance and identifies any problems that need to be resolved;(ii) assesses performance, efficiency and effectiveness of the use of the financial assistance;(iii) makes recommendations on follow-up actions required to remedy any problem identified; and(iv) provides an action plan documenting who should perform the recommended actions and a time frame within which they should be performed.(2) The department shall deliver the report to the Governor, to the chairman and minority chairman of the Transportation Committee of the Senate and to the chairman and minority chairman of the Transportation Committee of the 20250HB1510PN1779 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 House of Representatives. The department's regulations shall contain a description of the impact on both the amount of, and future eligibility for, financial assistance under this chapter based upon the degree to which the local transportation organization complies with the recommendations in the report. The department shall develop a list of best practices revealed by the reports issued under this subsection and shall post them on the department's Internet website.(f) Performance criteria.--Criteria used for the reviews conducted under subsection (e) shall consist of passengers per revenue vehicle hour, operating costs per revenue vehicle hour, operating revenue per revenue vehicle hour, operating costs per passenger and other items as the department may establish. The department's regulations shall set forth the minimum system performance criteria based upon comparison of the award recipient to its past performance and to its peers that an award recipient must satisfy.(g) Failure to satisfy minimum performance criteria.--(1) If a performance review conducted under subsection (e) reveals that the performance of an award recipient's transportation system has decreased compared to performance determined through a prior review, the department may, upon the written request of an award recipient, waive any requirement for a reduction in the amount of financial assistance to be awarded under this section for a reasonable time period to allow the award recipient to bring the system back to the required performance level. The award recipient shall provide written justification for providing a time period longer than two years. In order to obtain the waiver 20250HB1510PN1779 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for the period requested, the award recipient must do all of the following:(i) Develop an action plan to improve system performance that contains key measurable milestones. The action plan must be acceptable to the department and must be approved by the department in writing.(ii) Submit quarterly progress reports on the action plan to the department.(2) The department shall review and evaluate the award recipient's progress to determine if the system has improved. If the system has improved, the award recipient will remain eligible for full formula funding as determined under subsection (c). If the system has not improved by the end of the waiver period, the waiver will be withdrawn. Expenses incurred by the award recipient as a result of the failure of the award recipient's system to meet the minimum performance criteria shall be borne by the award recipient.(h) Adjustments to minimum performance criteria.--Upon written request of an award recipient, the department may adjust the minimum performance criteria described in subsection (g) in a given year if the performance of the award recipient's system is adversely affected by circumstances which are beyond the award recipient's control. Examples are labor strikes, infrastructure failures and natural disasters. The request must include the award recipient's reasons for seeking the adjustment.](e) Planning studies.--(1) Beginning January 1, 2026 , the department may require each award recipient to conduct an independent planning study or transportation development plan update 20250HB1510PN1779 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 every five years to evaluate the public transit services being funded under this section. The planning study shall include, but not be limited to, the following:(i) A financial performance analysis of existing services and trends.(ii) A customer satisfaction survey.(iii) A five-year capital improvement plan, including a performance target consistent with the recipient's adopted transit asset management plan for reaching a state of good repair.(iv) A five-year service plan based on customer and community input and participation.(v) A five-year financial plan based on the adopted service plan and levels of funding.(vi) An evaluation of safety and performance target related to the recipient's adopted local transportation agency safety plan.(vii) Other analysis as may be needed.(2) The department shall fund the planning studies through a technical assistance grant to the award recipient in full or in part and match Federal funds to conduct the study.(3) The department may utilize consultants already under contract or solicit independently or jointly with other transit systems for a consultant to conduct the study in compliance with all applicable Federal and State procurement regulations.(4) The department shall deliver an executive summary of the planning studies to the Governor, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the 20250HB1510PN1779 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives. The department shall develop a list of best practices documented by the studies conducted under this subsection and post the best practices and the executive summary on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(f) Performance criteria.--A p erformance target shall be developed by the recipient based on the current and projected trends in service and adopted by the recipient's governing board. The department shall review and evaluate the progress of the performance target to determine if the service has improved or if the performance target needs adjusted.(g) Hold harmless.--Notwithstanding subsection (d)(2), beginning in fiscal year 2025-2026 and ending in fiscal year 2035-2036, class 3 transit entities currently providing local matching funds at 15% of the amount of financial assistance received shall be held harmless in relation to the amount of annual increase in local match under subsection (d)(2).§ 1514. Asset improvement program.(a) Eligible applicants.--(1) The following may apply for financial assistance for improvement, replacement or expansion of capital projects under this section:(i) A local transportation organization.(ii) An agency or instrumentality of the Commonwealth engaged in public transportation service.(iii) A [person] public or nonprofit entity or organization responsible for coordinating community transportation program services.(iv) Any other [person] public or nonprofit entity 20250HB1510PN1779 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or organization that provides public transportation services the department deems to be eligible.(2) The department and the local transportation organization shall develop and maintain four-year and 12-year plans that summarize the capital projects and financial assistance commitments for each [applicant] local transportation organization in accordance with the local transportation organization's adopted transit asset management plan and annual performance target. The department may enter into multiyear agreements to provide financial assistance for capital projects based upon cash flow and revenue projections for the fund. Each capital project shall be based on the transit asset management plan developed by the local transportation organization in collaboration with the department.(b) Applications.--In addition to information required under section 1507 (relating to application and approval process), an application for financial assistance under this section shall include the following:(1) Evidence satisfactory to the department that the proposed capital project is included in the first year of the applicant's four-year capital plan, transit asset management plan's performance target and its federally approved transportation improvement program.(2) If an applicant is requesting financial assistance for replacement of a capital project, evidence satisfactory to the department that the capital project to be replaced has exceeded the useful life criteria [as defined by the department] in accordance with the applicant's transit asset management plan's performance target. At its discretion, the 20250HB1510PN1779 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department may approve funding to replace a capital project that does not exceed the useful life criteria if the applicant provides documentation acceptable to the department to justify the early replacement of the capital project.[(3) If the applicant is requesting financial assistance for expansion of a capital project, evidence satisfactory to the department that the applicant will have sufficient future annual operating funds to support the proposed expansion.(4) Any other information required by the department, including a return on investment analysis or a life cycle cost analysis, or both.]* * *(e) Priorities.--The award of [financial assistance under this section] discretionary funding under subsection (e.1)(4) shall be subject to the following set of priorities in descending order of significance unless a compelling return on investment analysis for a project in a lower category is provided to and approved by the department:* * *(2) Requests for funds required to match federally approved capital projects [funded under 49 U.S.C. §§ 5307 (relating to urbanized area formula grants) and 5309 (relating to capital investment grants and loans) and other federally approved capital projects].* * *(e.1) [Distribution.--] Allocation and distribution procedure .-- During each fiscal year, capital project, preventative maintenance costs and other program funds shall be distributed to each transit organization on a monthly basis in accordance with the formula specified in this section and used 20250HB1510PN1779 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 strictly in accordance with the use specified in this section. The department shall allocate financial assistance under this section on a percentage basis of available funds each fiscal year as follows:(1) [The local transportation organization organized and existing under Chapter 17 (relating to metropolitan transportation authorities) as the primary provider of public passenger transportation for the counties of Bucks, Chester, Delaware, Montgomery and Philadelphia shall receive 69.4% of the funds available for distribution under this section.] SEPTA shall receive 69.4% of the funds available for distribution under this section.(2) [The local transportation organization organized and existing under the act of April 6, 1956 (1955 P.L.1414, No.465), known as the Second Class County Port Authority Act, as the primary provider of public transportation for the county of Allegheny shall receive 22.6% of the funds available for distribution under this section.] PAAC shall receive 22.6% of the funds available for distribution under this section.(3) Other local transportation organizations organized and existing as the primary providers of public passenger transportation for the counties of this Commonwealth not identified under paragraph (1) or (2) shall receive 8% of the funds available for distribution under this section. The department shall allocate the funds under this paragraph among the local transportation organizations.(4) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1), (2) and (3) and before distributing the funds under paragraph (1), (2) or (3), the department shall set aside 5% of the funds available 20250HB1510PN1779 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for distribution under this section for discretionary use and distribution by the secretary.(5) The department shall promulgate regulations to provide that each year the department shall make available to each local transportation organization under paragraph (3) the local transportation organization's share of capital funds based on the approved formula for the allocation of funds under this section distribution as provided under this title by April 30 of each year. Based upon local planning efforts and board-approved projects, the department shall make grants to a local transportation organization for the amount applied for by the local transportation organization. Excess funds for which a local transportation organization does not apply shall be placed in a fund for the department to distribute to eligible local transportation organizations under paragraph (3).(6) On or before the fifth day of each month, the Treasury Department shall certify to the department the total amount then available for distribution and the department shall make distribution of payments required under this subsection on or before the 20th day of each month.(7) If, during any fiscal year, either the number of vehicles operated by a local transportation organization or transportation company or the area served by a local transportation organization or transportation company changes so that the local transportation organization or transportation company meets the criteria for a different transit entity class provided under section 1503 (relating to definitions), on or before July 15 of the fiscal year which follows the change and in each fiscal year thereafter, the 20250HB1510PN1779 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department shall reflect any change in the transit entity class of the local transportation organization or transportation company in the department certification for that year and subsequent fiscal years. The following shall apply:(i) In the department's calculation of the transit entity shares under this section for each transit entity class required by section 1508(e) (relating to Federal funding) for the fiscal year following the change in a local transportation organization or transportation company's transit entity class and thereafter, the department shall include the amount of the transit entity shares under this section allocated to the local transportation organization or transportation company for the fiscal year prior to the change in the transit entity class, in the transit entity shares under this section for the new transit entity class of such a local transportation organization or transportation company, and shall delete an equal amount from the transit entity shares under this section for the transit entity class for which such a local transportation organization or transportation company no longer meets the criteria in the new fiscal year.(ii) No local transportation organization or transportation company which has changed from one transit entity class to another due to either an increase in the number of vehicles operated or due to the most recent Federal decennial census prepared by the United States Census Bureau declaring the transportation organization or transportation company's service area an urbanized 20250HB1510PN1779 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 area shall receive less than the amount transferred on the account by the department under this section.(8) No change in classification or distribution to a class 1, 2, 3 or 4 transit entity shall change, reduce, alter or otherwise be done in a manner that would adversely impact the distribution percentages under this section and amounts that SEPTA and PAAC are entitled to under paragraphs (1) and (2).(f) Bonding by award recipients.--With the approval of the department, an award recipient that is permitted by law to issue bonds may do so for the purpose of financing a [multiyear] single year or multiyear capital project, as applicable. The department shall enter into an agreement with the award recipient providing that payments of the awarded funds sufficient to satisfy requirements of the bonds issued be made directly to the trustee of the bondholders until such time as the bonds are retired.Section 6. Section 1515(a) of Title 74 is amended and subsection (c) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1515. New initiatives program.(a) Eligible applicants.--[Persons] A public or nonprofit entity or organization eligible to apply for financial assistance under section 1514 (relating to asset improvement program) shall also be eligible to apply for financial assistance for new or expansions of fixed guideway systems or improvements of a corridor project designed to expedite bus service under this section.* * *(c) Source of funds and priorities.--* * *20250HB1510PN1779 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The department may develop and implement a pilot program to test and evaluate new models of paying and delivering shared ride and community transportation in collaboration with existing public transit systems and other transportation organizations and entities in this Commonwealth with the goal of developing a sustainable and need-based delivery and payment of services model.* * *Section 7. Sections 1516(a)(3) and (d)(3)(iv), (4) and (5) and 1518 of Title 74 are amended to read:§ 1516. Programs of Statewide significance.(a) General rule.--Money in the fund allocated for programs of Statewide significance shall be used by the department to support public transportation programs, activities and services not otherwise fully funded through the operating program, capital program or asset improvement program. In addition to any requirements contained in this section, applications must comply with section 1507 (relating to application and approval process). Programs of Statewide significance shall include:* * *(3) Community transportation capital and service stabilization. The department shall issue a notification of the availability of funds for the programs under this paragraph by March 1 of each year.* * *(d) Community transportation.--* * *(3) Financial assistance for service stabilization may only be provided for the following purposes:* * *20250HB1510PN1779 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) Offsetting operating expenses that cannot be covered by fare revenue due to emergencies declared by the Governor or reauthorized by the General Assembly.* * *(4) The department shall give high priority to providing financial assistance under this subsection as match for Federal funding to support capital projects for community transportation systems[.] as long as the Federal funding being matched is not reducing the amount of Federal funding available to support existing federally funded public transportation direct or subrecipients.[(5) The department shall conduct a study to evaluate the effectiveness and efficiency of community transportation service delivery as it relates to human service programs. The Department of Public Welfare, the Office of the Budget and the Department of Aging and other appropriate Commonwealth agencies identified by the department shall participate in the study. Within two years following the effective date of this section, these agencies shall make recommendations to the Governor and the Majority and Minority chairpersons of the Transportation Committee of the Senate and the Majority and Minority chairpersons of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives for improving coordination and efficiency of human services and community transportation.]* * *§ 1518. Program oversight and administration.The department is authorized to use available money in the fund to cover the costs incurred by the department in administering all of its public passenger transportation funding programs, including those established under this chapter, and 20250HB1510PN1779 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 incurred in the carrying out of its responsibilities with respect to the programs[.], not to exceed the amount authorized to the department under this chapter. The department shall annually produce a report on the department's publicly accessible Internet website detailing the amount of funding received for administering the program, total funding received and total funds disbursed under each program to be funded in the entire program.Section 8. Title 74 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1518.1. Small purchase threshold.A local transportation company or transportation organization may use small purchase threshold to acquire services, supplies or other property valued at more than the micro-purchase threshold but less than the Federal simplified acquisition threshold as defined under 2 CFR 200.1 (relating to definitions).Section 9. Section 1520 of Title 74 is repealed:[§ 1520. Evaluation of private investment opportunities.(a) Study.--A local transportation organization receiving funding in an amount greater than $5,000,000 annually under this chapter shall undertake a study to evaluate the feasibility of utilizing partnerships with private service providers and financial partners as a method to operate and finance new or existing services. Within one year following the effective date of this section, each local transportation organization required to evaluate private participation under this section shall submit a report to the secretary and the majority chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate and the majority chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives.20250HB1510PN1779 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Report.--The report shall, at a minimum, include the results of the evaluation, a determination of the viability of greater private partnering and any recommendations about how to achieve greater participation from the private sector.(c) Preclusion.--Nothing in this section shall preclude a local transportation organization receiving less than $5,000,000 annually under this chapter from making an evaluation of greater private involvement in their operations.]Section 10. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1510PN1779 - 27 - 123456789